New York, session 2025-2026, A11188.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 2 89-b of the navigation law, as amended by chapter 427 of the laws of 3 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) Upon the effective date of this paragraph and thereafter: 5 All vessels shall pay [eight dollars and eighty-six cents per pilotage 6 unit; from January first, two thousand twenty-three until January first, 7 two thousand twenty-four all vessels shall pay nine dollars and ninety- 8 seven cents per pilotage unit; from January first, two thousand twenty- 9 four until January first, two thousand twenty-five, all vessels shall 10 pay ten dollars and twenty-seven cents per pilotage unit; from January 11 first, two thousand twenty-five until January first, two thousand twen- 12 ty-six all vessels shall pay ten dollars and fifty-eight cents per pilo- 13 tage unit; from January first, two thousand twenty-six until January 14 first, two thousand twenty-seven all vessels shall pay] ten dollars and 15 eighty-nine cents per pilotage unit; [on and after] from January first, 16 two thousand twenty-seven until January first, two thousand twenty-eight 17 all vessels shall pay eleven dollars and twenty-two cents per pilotage 18 unit; from January first, two thousand twenty-eight until January first, 19 two thousand twenty-nine, all vessels shall pay eleven dollars and 20 eighty-nine cents per pilotage unit; from January first, two thousand 21 twenty-nine until January first, two thousand thirty all vessels shall 22 pay twelve dollars and thirty-seven cents per pilotage unit; from Janu- 23 ary first, two thousand thirty until January first, two thousand thir- 24 ty-one all vessels shall pay twelve dollars and eighty-six cents per 25 pilotage unit; from January first, two thousand thirty-one until January 26 first, two thousand thirty-two all vessels shall pay thirteen dollars 27 and thirty-eight cents per pilotage unit; on and after January first, 28 two thousand thirty-two all vessels shall pay [eleven dollars and twen- 29 ty-two cents] thirteen dollars and ninety-one cents per pilotage unit. 30 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15733-01-6